Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
MATERNAL AND PERINATAL STUDIES

§324-1 Requests for information; sources of
information protected. (a) Upon written request
from the director of health, all providers of health care, social services, and
county and state agencies shall provide information, reports,
statements, memoranda, death and birth records, or other data or material
relating to the condition and treatment of any person to the department of
health or its designee, to be used in the course of any study for the purpose
of reducing maternal morbidity or mortality.

(b) To the extent that this section conflicts
with other state confidentiality and disclosure laws, this section shall
prevail.

(c) The department
of health may request information regarding the deceased that is stored in
electronic format or in paper copies, or gathered through interviews, subject
to certain restrictions, which include but are not limited to:

(1) Social, medical, and legal histories;

(2) Death and birth certificates;

(3) Law enforcement investigative data;

(4) Medical examiner or coroner investigative data;

(5) Parole and probation information and records;

(6) Information and records of social service
agencies;

(7) Educational records;

(8) Medical records; and

(9) Interviews with hospital employees that shall be
subject to approval from hospital management.

Furthermore, all
requested disclosures shall comply with state and federal privacy statutes and
regulations, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act,
and the department of health shall not request records of any hospital review
committee, peer review committee, or quality improvement review process. The
department may enter into a memorandum of agreement with hospitals regarding
requests for information to be used for maternal mortality reviews.

No liability of any kind or character for
damages or other relief shall arise or be enforced against any person or
organization by reason of having provided the information or material, or by
reason of having released or published the findings, conclusions, and summaries
of the research or study committees to advance medical research and medical
education.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this part,
all maternal mortality review information acquired by the department during its
review of maternal deaths pursuant to this part is confidential and shall only
be disclosed as necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(e) No individual participating in the review
of a maternal death shall be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding
regarding information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a panel
meeting. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a person
from testifying to information obtained independently of the department's request
for maternal mortality review information or the panel's review of the maternal
death, or which is public information, or where disclosure is required by a
court of law.

(f) Maternal mortality review information held
by the department as a result of maternal mortality reviews conducted pursuant
to this part shall not be subject to subpoena, discovery, or introduction into
evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding, except that maternal mortality
review information otherwise available from other sources shall not be immune
from subpoena, discovery, or introduction into evidence through those sources
solely because they were provided to the department as required by this part. [L
1963, c 109, §1; Supp, §48B-1; HRS §324-1; am L 1990, c 326, §13(1); am L 2016,
c 203, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next